District of Columbia statutes.
34-1251.02

Repealed

Findings and purposes.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 102
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2072(b), 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 2072(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).